Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1409
Director; disclose information; when.

The director may forward to the representative of another state designated in the agreement any information in the director's possession relative to the manufacture, receipt, sale, use, transportation, or shipment of motor fuels by any person required to be licensed. The director may disclose information to the representative of the other state which relates to the location of officers, motor vehicles, and other real and personal property of persons required to be licensed under the agreement who use motor fuels. Any information covered by an agreement with the Internal Revenue Service may only be released in accordance with such agreement.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 29.